Connecticut, session 2026, SB00230.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 30-18a of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective from passage):
4 (a) As used in this section:
5 (1) "Out-of-state" (A) means (i) any state other than Connecticut, (ii)
6 any territory or possession of the United States, (iii) the District of
7 Columbia, or (iv) the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and (B) does not
8 include any foreign country;
9 (2) "Retailer" means any business entity that (A) is primarily engaged
10 in selling alcoholic liquor in sealed bottles or other containers for off-
11 premises consumption, and (B) holds a retailer permit issued by the
12 alcohol beverage authority of its home state; and
13 (3) "Wine" includes, but is not limited to, (A) cider not exceeding six
14 per cent alcohol by volume, and (B) apple wine not exceeding fifteen per
15 cent alcohol by volume.
LCO 1 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 230
16 [(a)] (b) (1) An out-of-state winery shipper's permit for wine shall
17 allow the sale of wine to manufacturer and wholesaler permittees in this
18 state as permitted by law and for those shippers that produce not more
19 than one hundred thousand gallons of wine per year, the sale and
20 shipment by the holder thereof to a retailer of wine manufactured by
21 such permittee in the original sealed containers of not more than fifteen
22 gallons per container. [For purposes of this section, "wine" shall include
23 cider not exceeding six per cent alcohol by volume and apple wine not
24 exceeding fifteen per cent alcohol by volume.]
25 (2) An out-of-state retailer shipper's permit for wine shall allow the
26 sale and shipment of wine directly to a consumer in this state.
27 [(b)] (c) Subject to the provisions of this subsection, the permits under
28 subsection [(a)] (b) of this section shall allow the sale and delivery or
29 shipment of wine manufactured or sold by the permittee directly to a
30 consumer in this state. Such permittee, when selling and shipping wine
31 directly to a consumer in this state, shall: (1) Ensure that the shipping
32 labels on all containers of wine shipped directly to a consumer in this
33 state conspicuously state the following: "CONTAINS ALCOHOL—
34 SIGNATURE OF A PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR
35 DELIVERY"; (2) obtain the signature of a person age twenty-one or older
36 at the address prior to delivery, after requiring the signer to demonstrate
37 that he or she is age twenty-one or older by providing a valid motor
38 vehicle operator's license or a valid identity card described in section 1-
39 1h; (3) not ship more than five gallons of wine in any two-month period
40 to any person in this state and not ship any wine until such permittee is
41 registered, with respect to the permittee's sales of wine to consumers in
42 this state, for purposes of the taxes imposed under chapters 219 and 220,
43 with the Department of Revenue Services; (4) pay, to the Department of
44 Revenue Services, all sales taxes and alcoholic beverage taxes due under
45 chapters 219 and 220 on sales of wine to consumers in this state, and file,
46 with said department, all sales tax returns and alcoholic beverage tax
47 returns relating to such sales, with the amount of such taxes to be
48 calculated as if the sale were in this state at the location where delivery
49 is made; (5) report to the Department of Consumer Protection a separate
LCO 2 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 230
50 and complete record of all sales and shipments to consumers in the state,
51 on a ledger sheet or similar form which readily presents a chronological
52 account of such permittee's dealings with each such consumer; (6)
53 permit the Department of Consumer Protection and Department of
54 Revenue Services, separately or jointly, to perform an audit of the
55 permittee's records upon request; (7) not ship to any address in the state
56 where the sale of alcoholic liquor is prohibited by local option pursuant
57 to section 30-9; (8) hold an in-state transporter permit under section 30-
58 19f or make any such shipment through the use of a person who holds
59 such an in-state transporter permit; (9) execute a written consent to the
60 jurisdiction of this state, its agencies and instrumentalities and the
61 courts of this state concerning the enforcement of this section and any
62 related laws, rules, or regulations, including tax laws, rules or
63 regulations; and (10) comply with the provisions of section 30-68m
64 regarding the prohibition of selling wine below cost.
65 [(c)] (d) The Department of Consumer Protection, in consultation
66 with the Department of Revenue Services, may adopt regulations in
67 accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 to assure compliance with
68 the provisions of subsection [(b)] (c) of this section.
69 [(d)] (e) A holder of a permit under subsection [(a)] (b) of this section,
70 when advertising or offering wine for direct shipment to a consumer in
71 this state via the Internet or any other on-line computer network, shall
72 clearly and conspicuously state such liquor permit number in its
73 advertising.
74 [(e)] (f) (1) For purposes of chapter 219, the holder of a permit under
75 subsection [(a)] (b) of this section, when shipping wine directly to a
76 consumer in this state, shall be deemed to be a retailer engaged in
77 business in this state as defined in chapter 219 and shall be required to
78 be issued a seller's permit pursuant to chapter 219.
79 (2) For purposes of chapter 220, the holder of a permit under
80 subsection [(a)] (b) of this section, when shipping wine directly to a
81 consumer in this state, shall be deemed to be a distributor as defined in
LCO 3 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 230
82 chapter 220 and shall be required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 220.
83 [(f)] (g) Any person who applies for an out-of-state winery shipper's
84 permit for wine or for the renewal of such permit shall furnish an
85 affidavit to the Department of Consumer Protection, in such form as
86 may be prescribed by the department, affirming whether the out-of-
87 state winery that is the subject of such permit produced more than one
88 hundred thousand gallons of wine during the most recently completed
89 calendar year.
90 [(g)] (h) The annual fee for an out-of-state winery shipper's permit for
91 wine shall be three hundred fifteen dollars and the annual fee for an out-
92 of-state retailer shipper's permit for wine shall be six hundred dollars.
93 [(h) As used in this section, "out-of-state" means any state other than
94 Connecticut, any territory or possession of the United States, the District
95 of Columbia or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, but does not include
96 any foreign country.]
97 Sec. 2. Subsection (b) of section 30-37f of the general statutes is
98 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
99 passage):
100 (b) Sections 30-9 to 30-13a, inclusive, section 30-22aa, subdivision [(2)]
101 (3) of subsection (b) of section 30-39, as amended by this act, subsection
102 (c) of section 30-39 and sections 30-44, 30-46, 30-48a and 30-91a shall not
103 apply to a cafe permit issued pursuant to subsection (d) of section 30-
104 22a.
105 Sec. 3. Subsection (b) of section 30-39 of the 2026 supplement to the
106 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
107 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
108 (b) (1) Any person desiring a liquor permit or a renewal of such a
109 permit shall make an affirmed application therefor to the Department of
110 Consumer Protection, upon forms to be furnished by the department,
111 showing the name and address of the applicant and of the applicant's
LCO 4 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 230
112 backer, if any, the location of the club or place of business which is to be
113 operated under such permit and a financial statement setting forth all
114 elements and details of any business transactions connected with the
115 application. [Such] If such application is for a liquor permit that allows
116 on-premises serving or consumption of alcoholic liquor, such
117 application shall also include a detailed description of the type of live
118 entertainment that is to be provided. A club or place of business shall be
119 exempt from providing such detailed description if the club or place of
120 business (A) was issued a liquor permit prior to October 1, 1993, and (B)
121 has not altered the type of entertainment provided. The application shall
122 also indicate any crimes of which the applicant or the applicant's backer
123 may have been convicted. The department shall not review an initial
124 application until the applicant has submitted all documents necessary
125 to establish that state and local building, fire and zoning requirements
126 and local ordinances concerning hours and days of sale will be met,
127 except that local building and zoning requirements and local ordinances
128 concerning hours and days of sale shall not apply to a cafe permit issued
129 under subsection (d) or (h) of section 30-22a. If the applicant does not
130 submit all such documents within the thirty-day period beginning on
131 the date on which the department receives the initial application, or if
132 such documents are not fully executed by the appropriate authorities,
133 such initial application shall be deemed withdrawn and invalid. The
134 State Fire Marshal or the marshal's certified designee shall be
135 responsible for approving compliance with the State Fire Code at
136 Bradley International Airport. Any person desiring a permit provided
137 for in section 30-33b shall file a copy of such person's license with such
138 application if such license was issued by the Department of Consumer
139 Protection. The department may, at its discretion, conduct an
140 investigation to determine (i) whether a permit shall be issued to an
141 applicant or the applicant's backer, or (ii) the suitability of the proposed
142 permit premises. Completion of an inspection pursuant to subsection (f)
143 of section 29-305 shall not be deemed to constitute a precondition to
144 renewal of a permit that is subject to subsection (f) of section 29-305.
145 (2) The applicant shall pay to the department a nonrefundable
LCO 5 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 230
146 application fee, which fee shall be in addition to the fees prescribed in
147 this chapter for the permit sought. An application fee shall not be
148 charged for an application to renew a permit. The application fee shall
149 be in the amount of ten dollars for the filing of each application for a
150 permit by a nonprofit golf tournament permit under section 30-37g or a
151 temporary liquor permit for a noncommercial entity under section 30-
152 35; and in the amount of one hundred dollars for the filing of an initial
153 application for all other permits. Any permit issued shall be valid only
154 for the purposes and activities described in the application.
155 (3) (A) The applicant shall affix, and maintain in a legible condition
156 upon the outer door of the building wherein such place of business is to
157 be located and clearly visible from the public highway, the placard
158 provided by the department, not later than the day following the receipt
159 of the placard by the applicant. If such outer door of such premises is so
160 far from the public highway that such placard is not clearly visible as
161 provided, the department shall direct a suitable method to notify the
162 public of such application. When an application is filed for any type of
163 permit for a building that has not been constructed, such applicant shall
164 erect and maintain in a legible condition a sign not less than six feet by
165 four feet upon the site where such place of business is to be located,
166 instead of such placard upon the outer door of the building. The sign
167 shall set forth the type of permit applied for and the name of the
168 proposed permittee, shall be clearly visible from the public highway and
169 shall be so erected not later than the day following the receipt of the
170 placard. Such applicant shall make a return to the department, under
171 oath, of compliance with the foregoing requirements, in such form as
172 the department may determine, but the department may require any
173 additional proof of such compliance. Upon receipt of evidence of such
174 compliance, the department may hold a hearing as to the suitability of
175 the proposed location.
176 (B) The provisions of subparagraph (A) of this subdivision regarding
177 placarding shall not apply to applications for [(A)] (i) airline permits
178 issued under section 30-28a, [(B)] (ii) temporary liquor permits for
179 noncommercial entities issued under section 30-35, [(C)] (iii) concession
LCO 6 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 230
180 permits issued under section 30-33, [(D)] (iv) military permits issued
181 under section 30-34, [(E)] (v) cafe permits issued under subsection (h) of
182 section 30-22a, [(F)] (vi) warehouse permits issued under section 30-32,
183 [(G)] (vii) broker's permits issued under section 30-30, [(H)] (viii) out-of-
184 state shipper's permits for alcoholic liquor issued under section 30-18,
185 [(I)] (ix) out-of-state shipper's permits for beer issued under section 30-
186 19, [(J)] (x) coliseum permits issued under section 30-33a, [(K)] (xi)
187 nonprofit golf tournament permits issued under section 30-37g, [(L)]
188 (xii) Connecticut craft cafe permits issued under section 30-22d to
189 permittees who held a manufacturer permit for a brew pub or a
190 manufacturer permit for beer issued under subsection (b) of section 30-
191 16 and a brew pub before July 1, 2020, [(M)] (xiii) off-site farm winery
192 sales and wine, cider and mead tasting permits issued under section 30-
193 16a, [(N)] (xiv) out-of-state retailer shipper's permits for wine issued
194 under section 30-18a, as amended by this act, [(O)] (xv) out-of-state
195 winery shipper's permits for wine issued under section 30-18a, as
196 amended by this act, [(P)] (xvi) in-state transporter permits for alcoholic
197 liquor issued under section 30-19f, including, but not limited to, boats
198 operating under such permits, [(Q)] (xvii) seasonal outdoor open-air
199 permits issued under section 30-22e, [(R)] (xviii) festival permits issued
200 under section 30-37t, [(S)] (xix) temporary auction permits issued under
201 section 30-37u, [(T)] (xx) outdoor open-air permits issued under section
202 30-22f, and [(U)] (xxi) renewals of any permit described in
203 subparagraphs [(A)] (B)(i) to [(T)] (B)(xx), inclusive, of this subdivision,
204 if applicable. [The]
205 (C) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (B) of this
206 subdivision, the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this subdivision
207 regarding [placard display] placarding shall [also be required of] apply
208 to any applicant who seeks to amend the type of live entertainment to
209 be provided, either upon filing of a renewal application or upon
210 requesting permission of the department in a form that requires the
211 approval of the municipal zoning official.
212 (4) In any case in which a permit has been issued to a partnership, if
213 one or more of the partners dies or retires, the remaining partner or
LCO 7 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 230
214 partners need not file a new application for the unexpired portion of the
215 current permit, and no additional fee for such unexpired portion shall
216 be required. Notice of any such change shall be given to the department
217 and the permit shall be endorsed to show correct ownership. When any
218 partnership changes by reason of the addition of one or more persons, a
219 new application with new fees shall be required.
220 Sec. 4. Section 30-45 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
221 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
222 passage):
223 [The] (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the
224 Department of Consumer Protection shall refuse [permits] any permit
225 for the sale of alcoholic liquor to: [the following persons:] (1) Any state
226 marshal, judicial marshal, judge of any court, prosecuting officer or
227 member of any police force; (2) [any minor; (3)] any constable who (A)
228 performs criminal law enforcement duties and is considered a peace
229 officer by town ordinance pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a)
230 of section 54-1f, or (B) is certified under the provisions of sections 7-294a
231 to 7-294e, inclusive, and performs criminal law enforcement duties
232 pursuant to the provisions of subsection (c) of section 54-1f; [and (4)] (3)
233 any special constable appointed pursuant to section 7-92; [. This] and (4)
234 any minor as the permittee or as a member, principal or partner of the
235 backer, provided nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
236 require the department to refuse any such permit to a trust with a named
237 beneficiary who is a minor.
238 (b) The provisions of subdivisions (1) to (3), inclusive, of subsection
239 (a) of this section shall not apply to: [any] (1) Any out-of-state shipper's
240 permit issued under section 30-18, 30-18a, as amended by this act, or 30-
241 19; [,] (2) any cafe permit issued under section 30-22a; [,] (3) any cafe
242 permit for wine, beer and cider issued under section 30-22g; [,] (4) any
243 boat operating under any in-state transporter permit issued under
244 section 30-19f; or (5) any airline permit issued under section 30-28a. [As
245 used in this section, "minor" means a minor, as defined in section 1-1d
246 or as defined in section 30-1, whichever age is older.]
LCO 8 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 230
247 Sec. 5. Section 30-86a of the general statutes is repealed and the
248 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
249 (a) For the purposes of section 30-86, any permittee shall require any
250 person whose age is in question to fill out and sign a statement in the
251 following form on one occasion when each such person makes a
252 purchase:
253 ...., 20..
254 I, ...., hereby represent to ...., a permittee of the Connecticut
255 Department of Consumer Protection, that I am over the age of 21 years,
256 having been born on ...., 19.. or 20.., at ..... (city), ….. (state). This
257 statement is made to induce said permittee to sell or otherwise furnish
258 alcoholic beverages to the undersigned. I understand that title 30 of the
259 general statutes prohibits the sale of alcoholic liquor to any person who
260 is not twenty-one years of age.
261 I understand that I am subject to a fine of one hundred dollars for the
262 first offense and not more than two hundred fifty dollars for each
263 subsequent offense for wilfully misrepresenting my age for the
264 purposes set forth in this statement.
265 .... (Name)
266 .... (Address)
267 Such statement once taken shall be applicable both to the particular
268 sale in connection with which such statement was taken, as well as to all
269 future sales at the same premises, and shall have full force and effect
270 under subsection (b) of this section as to every subsequent sale or
271 purchase. Such statement shall be printed upon appropriate forms to be
272 furnished by the permittee and approved by the Department of
273 Consumer Protection or electronically displayed by the permittee on an
274 electronic device that is capable of allowing the person whose age is in
275 question to electronically fill out and sign such statement. If such
276 statement is filled out and signed in paper form, such statement shall be
LCO 9 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 230
277 kept on file on the permit premises, alphabetically indexed, in a suitable
278 file box, and shall be open to inspection by the department or any of the
279 department's agents or inspectors at any reasonable time. If such
280 statement is filled out and signed in electronic form, such statement
281 shall be stored in an electronic medium that is immediately accessible
282 from the permit premises, alphabetically indexed, and shall be in an
283 electronic format that is accessible to the department or any of the
284 department's agents or inspectors at any reasonable time. Any person
285 who makes any false statement on a form signed by such person as
286 required by this section shall be fined not more than one hundred
287 dollars for the first offense and not more than two hundred fifty dollars
288 for each subsequent offense.
289 (b) In any case where such a statement has been procured and the
290 permittee is subsequently charged with serving or furnishing alcoholic
291 beverages to a minor, if such permittee, in proceedings before any court
292 of this state or the Department of Consumer Protection, introduces such
293 statement in evidence and shows both that the evidence presented to
294 [him] such permittee to establish the age of the purchaser was such as
295 would convince a reasonable [man] person and that such permittee or
296 the backer otherwise acted reasonably in serving or furnishing alcoholic
297 beverages to the minor, no penalty shall be imposed on such permittee.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 30-18a
Sec. 2 from passage 30-37f(b)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 30-39(b)
Sec. 4 from passage 30-45
Sec. 5 from passage 30-86a
GL Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 10 of 10